Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-7-1.
Payment for personal services by state departments.

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget is authorized, in his discretion, to require any department of state government to calculate and to make payment for personal services on the basis of 26 pay periods per year.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 125, § 1.

45-7-2.
Compensation of state official for serving in ex officio position.

No state official who receives, as a part of his compensation, pay for service on an ex officio office or position held by such officer shall receive any compensation for such service in any such ex officio office created subsequent to May 1, 1963, unless the statute creating the ex officio office shall specifically provide for compensation for the ex officio officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 586, § 1.

45-7-3.
Compensation of state officials designated in Code Sections 45-7-4, 45-7-20, and 45-7-21; reimbursement of members of General Assembly serving on advisory boards and similar entities of the executive and judicial branches.

Unless specifically stated otherwise, the state officials designated in Code Sections 45-7-4, 45-7-20, and 45-7-21 shall not receive from state funds any compensation, salary, contingent expense allowance, longevity pay, or allowance of any kind other than that specified or provided for in such Code sections. The annual salary for each such official shall be paid in equal monthly or semimonthly installments.

Members of the General Assembly may be reimbursed from funds of the executive and judicial branches of state government for their service upon advisory or investigative boards, committees, commissions, and other similar entities of the executive and judicial branches, subject to the following conditions:

Such reimbursement shall be limited to actual expenses incurred or to actual travel expenses incurred and a per diem allowance not to exceed the per diem allowance paid to members of the General Assembly for service on interim committees of the General Assembly, provided that a mileage allowance for use of a personal motor vehicle may be substituted for actual expenses incurred in the use of the vehicle; and

No such reimbursement shall be paid to any member of the General Assembly for any day upon which the member of the General Assembly receives compensation or reimbursement from the legislative branch of state government.

Members of the General Assembly are expressly authorized to receive reimbursement as provided for in this subsection, and the executive and judicial branches of state government are expressly authorized to pay reimbursement as provided for in this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 701, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 4, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 284, § 1.

Cross references.

Acceptance of other compensated office or appointment by member of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. IV.

45-7-4.
Annual salaries of certain state officials; cost-of-living adjustments.

The annual salary of each of the state officials listed below shall be as follows:

Governor . . . . . $175,000.00

An allowance in an amount specified in the appropriations Act shall also be provided for the operation of the Governor’s mansion.

Lieutenant Governor . . . . . 54,920.00

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the annual salary for the Lieutenant Governor for the 2021 fiscal year shall be reduced by an amount equal to 14 percent of the amount received for such office during the 2020 fiscal year.

Adjutant general

The adjutant general shall continue to receive the pay and allowances under the same procedure as provided by law.

Commissioner of Agriculture . . . . . 100,429.00

Attorney General . . . . . 114,633.00

Reserved.

Commissioner of Insurance . . . . . 100,396.00

Reserved.

Commissioner of Labor . . . . . 100,418.00

The above amount of salary for the Commissioner of Labor shall include any compensation received from the United States government and the amount of state funds paid shall be reduced by the amount of compensation received from the United States government.

Reserved.

Each member of the Public Service Commission . . . . . 96,655.00

Reserved.

State School Superintendent . . . . . 102,708.00

Secretary of State . . . . . 102,708.00

Reserved.

Reserved.

Reserved.

Each Justice of the Supreme Court . . . . . 175,600.00

Each Judge of the Court of Appeals . . . . . 174,500.00

(19.1)

Judge of the Georgia State-wide Business Court
. . . . .
174,500.00

Each superior court judge . . . . . 126,265.00

Each district attorney . . . . . 120,072.00

Each member of the General Assembly . . . . . 16,200.00

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the annual salary for each member of the General Assembly for the 2021 fiscal year shall be reduced by an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount received for such office during the 2020 fiscal year.

Each member of the General Assembly shall also receive the allowances provided by law. The amount of the daily expense allowance which each member is entitled to receive under the provisions of Code Section 28-1-8 shall be as provided in that Code section. The mileage allowance for the use of a personal car on official business shall be the same as that received by other state officials and employees.

In addition to any other compensation and allowances authorized for members of the General Assembly, each member may be reimbursed for per diem differential and for actual expenses incurred in the performance of duties as a member of the General Assembly in an amount not to exceed $7,000.00 per year. Expenses reimbursable up to such amount shall be limited to one or more of the following purposes: lodging, meals, per diem differential, postage, personal services, printing and publications, rents, supplies (including software), telecommunications, transportation, utilities, purchasing or leasing of equipment, and other reasonable expenditures directly related to the performance of a member’s duties. If equipment purchased by a member has a depreciated value of $100.00 or less when such member leaves office, the equipment does not need to be returned to the state. No reimbursement shall be made for any postage which is used for a political newsletter. No reimbursement shall be paid for lodging or meals for any day for which a member receives the daily expense allowance as provided in this paragraph. Eligible expenses shall be reimbursed following the submission of vouchers to the legislative fiscal office in compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph and subject to the provisions of subparagraph (E) of this paragraph. Such vouchers shall be submitted in such form and manner as prescribed by the Legislative Services Committee pursuant to subparagraph (E) of this paragraph, provided that each such voucher shall be accompanied by a supporting document or documents, or legible copies thereof, showing payment for each expense claimed or an explanation of the absence of such documentation; in addition, each such voucher shall include a certification by the member that the information contained in such voucher and supporting document or documents, or legible copies thereof, is true and correct and that such expenses were incurred by the member. The provisions of Code Section 16-10-20 shall be applicable to any person submitting such certified vouchers and supporting documents or copies the same as if the General Assembly were a department or agency of state government. No such voucher or supporting document shall be required for per diem differential.

The amount of per diem differential which may be claimed for each day under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph shall be the difference between the daily expense allowance authorized for members of the General Assembly and $119.00; provided, however, that the General Appropriations Act for any fiscal year may increase such amount of $119.00 per day to an amount not in excess of the federal per diem rate then in effect for the state capital as specified by the General Services Administration. Per diem differential shall be paid by the legislative fiscal office to the member upon the member’s notification to the legislative fiscal office of the days for which the daily expense allowance was received for which the member wishes to claim the per diem differential, and the legislative fiscal office shall keep a record of the days for which per diem differential is so claimed and paid.

For the purposes of this paragraph, a year shall begin on the convening date of the General Assembly in regular session each year and end on the day prior to the convening of the General Assembly in the next calendar year. Any voucher or claim for any reimbursement for any year as defined in this paragraph shall be submitted no later than the fifteenth of April immediately following the end of such year. No reimbursement shall be made on any voucher or claim submitted after that date. Any amounts remaining in such expense account at the end of the first year of the two-year biennium may be claimed for expenses incurred during the second year of the two-year biennium. Any amounts remaining in any expense account which are not so claimed by April 15 of the year following the second year of the biennium and any amounts claimed which are returned as hereafter provided for in this paragraph shall lapse and shall be remitted by the legislative fiscal office to the general fund of the state treasury. Any former member of the General Assembly may be reimbursed for expenses incurred while a member of the General Assembly upon compliance with the provisions of this paragraph. The Legislative Services Committee is empowered to provide such procedures as it deems advisable to administer the provisions of this paragraph, including, but not limited to, definitions of the above list of items for which reimbursement may be made; provided, however, that the term “other reasonable expenditures directly related to the performance of a member’s duties” shall be as defined by policies adopted by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and by the Senate Administrative Affairs Committee as to reimbursement of such expenditures incurred by members of the House and Senate, respectively; and provided, further, that the amount of expenses which may be reimbursed within the limits of subparagraph (C) of this paragraph for travel outside the state may be as provided by policies adopted by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and by the Senate Administrative Affairs Committee as to such expenditures of members of the House and Senate, respectively. The Legislative Services Committee is further empowered to prescribe the form of the voucher or claim which must be submitted to the legislative fiscal office. In the event of any disagreement as to whether any reimbursement shall be made or any allowance shall be paid, the Legislative Services Committee shall make the final determination; except that in the event of any disagreement as to whether any reimbursement under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph shall be made for other reasonable expenses directly related to the performance of a member’s duties or for travel outside the state, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall make the final determination as to such expenses incurred by a member of the House, and the Senate Administrative Affairs Committee shall make the final determination as to such expenses incurred by a member of the Senate. In the event any reimbursement is made or any allowance is paid and it is later determined that such reimbursement or payment was made in error, the person to whom such reimbursement or payment was made shall remit to the legislative fiscal office the amount of money involved. In the event any such person refuses to make such remittance, the legislative fiscal office is authorized to withhold the payment of any other moneys to which such person is entitled until the amount of such reimbursement or payment which was made in error shall be realized.

Speaker of the House of Representatives . . . . . 17,800.00

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall also receive the salary and allowances authorized as a member of the General Assembly. Upon the taking of office by the members of the General Assembly on the convening day of the regular session of the General Assembly in 1983, the annual salary of the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall become $22,800.00. After such date, the Speaker shall also receive as additional salary a sum equal to the amount of salary over $30,000.00 per annum which is received by the Lieutenant Governor as of that date or thereafter; and the salary of the Speaker shall be adjusted at the beginning of each term so as to include such additional sum.

President Pro Tempore of the Senate . . . . . 4,800.00

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall also receive the salary and allowances authorized as a member of the General Assembly.

Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives . . . . . 4,800.00

The Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives shall also receive the salary and allowances authorized as a member of the General Assembly.

As an adjustment except as qualified below as to members and member-officers of the General Assembly, the annual salary of each state official whose salary is established by Code Section 45-7-3, this Code section, and Code Sections 45-7-20 and 45-7-21, including members of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, may be increased by the General Assembly in the General Appropriations Act by a percentage not to exceed the average percentage of the increase in salary as may from time to time be granted to employees of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches of government. However, any increase for such officials shall not include within-grade step increases for which employees subject to compensation plans authorized and approved in accordance with Code Section 45-20-4 are eligible. Any increase granted pursuant to this subsection shall become effective at the same time that funds are made available for the increase for such employees, except increases for members and member-officers of the General Assembly. That portion of the increase determined by the Legislative Services Committee to reflect a cost-of-living increase based upon objective economic criteria shall become effective for members and member-officers at the same time that funds are made available for the increase for such employees. The balance of the increase for members and member-officers of the General Assembly shall become effective on the convening of the next General Assembly in January of the next odd-numbered year. The Office of Planning and Budget shall calculate the average percentage increase.

The annual salary being received on June 30, 1980, shall be increased by 8 percent for each state official listed in subsection (a) of this Code section who:

Is not a member of the General Assembly; and

Is not a contributing member of a state retirement system and, therefore, does not benefit by or participate in any program whereunder a portion of the employee contributions to the state retirement system are made on behalf of the employee by the employer.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 701, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 4, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 902, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 756, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 758, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 19; Ga. L. 1981, p. 894, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1255, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 34; Ga. L. 1983, p. 719, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 20; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1831, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 444, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 808, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 493, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 524, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 672, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 154, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 284, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 212, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 579, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1363, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 1994, p. 851, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1065, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1018, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1302, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 910, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, §§ 5, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1242, §§ 2, 2.1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 783, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2006, p. 414, § 5/HB 268; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-69/HB 642; Ga. L. 2015, p. 919, § 1-9/HB 279; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, §§ 1-1, 2-1, 2-2/HB 202; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 45/SB 365; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 1-2/HB 239; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 45/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 208, §§ 1, 2/SB 416.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016 substituted “175,600.00” for “139,418.00” in paragraph (a)(18); substituted “174,500.00” for “138,556.00” in paragraph (a)(19), substituted “126,265.00” for “99,862.00”, and deleted “Each superior court judge shall also receive any supplement paid to such judge by the county or counties of such judge’s judicial circuit as may be provided for by law. Each superior court judge shall also receive reimbursement of travel expenses as provided by law.” in paragraph (a)(20); and substituted “120,072.00” for “107,905.00”, and deleted “Each district attorney shall also receive any supplement paid to such district attorney by the county or counties of such district attorney’s judicial circuit as may be provided for by law.
Each district attorney shall also receive reimbursement of travel expenses as provided by law.” in paragraph (a)(21). See editor’s note for effective date.

The 2017 amendment,

effective January 14, 2019, substituted “$175,000.00” for “$60,000.00” in paragraph (a)(1); and, effective July 1, 2017,
substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (a)(22)(C) for the former provisions, which read: “In addition to any other compensation and allowances authorized for members of the General Assembly, each member may be reimbursed for per diem differential and for actual expenses incurred in the performance of duties within the state as a member of the General Assembly in an amount not to exceed $7,000.00 per year. Expenses reimbursable up to such amount shall be limited to one or more of the following purposes: lodging, meals, per diem differential, postage, personal services, printing and publications, rents, supplies (including software), telecommunications, transportation, utilities, and purchasing or leasing of equipment. If equipment purchased by a member has a depreciated value of $100.00 or less when such member leaves office, the equipment does not need to be returned to the state. No reimbursement shall be made for any postage which is used for a political newsletter. No reimbursement shall be paid for lodging or meals for any day for which a member receives the daily expense allowance as provided in this paragraph. Such expenses shall be reimbursed upon the submission of sworn vouchers to the legislative fiscal office. Such sworn vouchers shall be accompanied by a supporting document or documents showing payment for each expense claimed or an explanation of the absence of such documentation. No sworn voucher or supporting document shall be required for per diem differential.”; in subparagraph (a)(22)(E), substituted the present provisions of the seventh sentence for the former provisions, which read: “The Legislative Services Committee is empowered to provide such procedures as it deems advisable to administer the provisions of this paragraph, including, but not limited to, definitions of the above list of items for which reimbursement may be made and the form of the voucher or claim which must be submitted to the legislative fiscal office.” and added the exception at the end of the ninth sentence; and, in the first sentence of subsection (b), substituted “an adjustment” for “a cost-of-living adjustment” at the beginning and deleted “general” preceding “increase in salary” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall make” for “the Speaker of the House shall make” in the ninth sentence of subparagraph (a)(22)(E).

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective May 7, 2019, added paragraph (a)(19.1). The second 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “two-year biennium” for “two year biennium” in two places in the fourth sentence of subparagraph (a)(22)(E).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 14, 2020, added “Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the annual salary for the Lieutenant Governor for the 2021 fiscal year shall be reduced by an amount equal to 14 percent of the amount received for such office during the 2020 fiscal year.” in paragraph (a)(2) and substituted “Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the annual salary for each member of the General Assembly for the 2021 fiscal year shall be reduced by an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount received for such office during the 2020 fiscal year.” for “Reserved” in subparagraph (a)(22)(A).

Cross references.

Reimbursement of superior court judges for travel and other expenses, §§

15-6-30

et seq.

Additional compensation of district attorneys, and as to reimbursement of district attorneys and assistant district attorneys for travel expenses, §

15-18-10

.

Further provisions regarding salary and allowances of members of General Assembly, Speaker of House of Representatives, and other officers, §

28-1-8

.

Requirements regarding introduction of bills changing compensation for state officials or department or agency heads, §

28-5-1

et seq.

Reimbursement of expenses of state officials generally, §

45-7-20

et seq.

Recommendations of amount of compensation to be established by law for constitutional state officers, §

45-7-90

et seq.

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “government” was substituted for “Government” in two places in paragraph (a)(9) of subsection (a).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, the comma was deleted following “General Assembly” near the middle of subsection (b).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “ Code Section 45-7-3, this Code section, and
Code Sections 45-7-20 and
45-7-21” was substituted for “ Code Sections 45-7-3, this
Code section, 45-7-20, and
45-7-21” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1401, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section V, Paragraph I, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 1988, p. 284, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 1988 amendment would become effective on the convening date of the 1989 regular session of the General Assembly. The session convened on January 9, 1989.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 212, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes only of the general appropriations Act for the year beginning July 1, 1989, the cost-of-living adjustment provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-4 shall not apply with respect to Justices of the Supreme Court and Judges of the Court of Appeals.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1363, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 1991 amendment shall apply with respect to claims for expense reimbursements submitted on or after April 16, 1991.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 45, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(1) Notwithstanding the reenactment of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated by Section 54 of this Act, the increase in the amount of daily expense allowances for each member of the General Assembly which is contained in the third undesignated paragraph [now subparagraph (B)] of paragraph (22) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-7-4, relating to annual salaries of certain state officials, shall not become effective until the date specified in the 1995 Act amending such language. Until such time, such undesignated paragraph shall read as it formerly existed.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1302, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amount of daily expense allowance shall remain $59.00 until the convening date of the 1997 regular session of the General Assembly and that on and after such date the allowance shall be $75.00.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“If the appropriations Act of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1999, and ending June 30, 2000, provides a percentage increase in salary for the officials affected by this Act, as authorized in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-4, such percentage increase shall be cumulative and in addition to the increases provided under Section 5 (paragraphs (4) through 21 of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-7-4) of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 919, § 4-1(b), not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(b)(1)
Part I of this Act shall become effective only if funds are appropriated for purposes of Part I of this Act in an appropriations Act enacted at the 2015 regular session of the General Assembly.

“(2) If funds are so appropriated, then Part I of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, for purposes of making the initial appointments of the Court of Appeals Judges created by Part I of this Act, and for all other purposes, Part I of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2016.

“(3) If funds are not so appropriated, then Part I of this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2015.” Funds were appropriated at the 2015 session of the General Assembly.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 4-1/HB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of subparagraphs (a)(22)(C) and (a)(22)(E) and subsection (b) shall apply to expenses incurred on or after July 1, 2017.

Law reviews.

For article discussing judicial compensation, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 110 (1978).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

45-7-5.
Compensation of Lieutenant Governor.

The Lieutenant Governor shall be compensated in the amount and manner provided in Code Sections 45-7-3 and 45-7-4. He shall also be entitled to reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier and the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile while on official business, together with the actual cost of meals and lodging while on official state business, as provided in Code Section 45-7-20.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 106, § 2.

45-7-6.
Members of boards and other public entities not to be paid for more than one meeting per day.

No member of a public agency, board, bureau, commission, authority, or body who is paid on a per meeting basis shall be paid for more than one meeting in any one calendar day.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 166, § 1.

45-7-7.
Compensation and allowances of certain officials not to be changed without giving public notice.

The compensation or allowances of the officials listed in subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be changed by the governing board or body having the authority to do so unless public notice of such proposed action and amount shall have been given at least 30 days prior to the date such board or body shall consider such action and unless notice of such proposed change shall have likewise been given to the Governor by the board or body at least 30 days prior to the date of such proposed change.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to the compensation and allowances of the commissioner of community affairs, the director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the director of the State Forestry Commission, the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the executive director of the Georgia Franchise Practices Commission, the commissioner of human services, the commissioner of economic development, the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner of public safety, the chancellor of the University System of Georgia, the president or executive director of the Georgia Student Finance Commission, the executive director of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, the executive secretary-treasurer of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, the commissioner of transportation, and the executive director of the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 392, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 28; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 8/SB 146; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 27/SB 17.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, an apostrophe was deleted following “Teachers” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of any substantive conflict between this Act and any other Act of the 1989 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

45-7-8.
Officer dismissal for charging or taking fees not allowed or for services not performed.

Any public officer who shall charge or take fees not allowed by law or for service not performed shall, on conviction or proof thereof, be dismissed from office.

History.

Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 357; Code 1863, § 3634; Code 1868, § 3659; Code 1873, § 3710; Code 1882, § 3710; Penal Code 1895, § 1098; Penal Code 1910, § 1125; Code 1933, § 89-702.

Cross references.

Acceptance of other compensated office or appointment by member of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. IV.

45-7-9.
Compensation for line-of-duty injuries of full-time state employees; exceptions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agency” means every state department, agency, board, bureau, commission, and authority, except the Department of Transportation.

“Full-time” means an employee who regularly works 30 hours or more each week.

“Injured in the line of duty” means an injury which arises out of or in the course of employment. Going to or from work shall not be considered in the line of duty.

“State employee” means a full-time employee of an agency.

Any state employee who becomes physically disabled as a result of a physical injury incurred in the line of duty and caused by a willful act of violence committed by a person other than a fellow employee shall be entitled to receive compensation as provided in this Code section.

Any person injured in the line of duty as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall continue to receive his regular compensation for the period of time that the employee or officer is physically unable to perform the duties of his employment; provided, however, that such benefits provided in this Code section shall not be granted for injuries resulting from a single incident for more than a total of 180 working days. An employee, firefighter, or officer shall be required to submit to his department head satisfactory evidence of such disability.

Benefits made available under this Code section shall be subordinate to any workers’ compensation benefits which the employee is awarded and shall be limited to the difference between the amount of workers’ compensation benefits actually paid and the amount of the employee’s regular compensation.

Any employee of the Department of Corrections, employee of the Department of Community Supervision, employee of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, employee of the Department of Natural Resources, employee of the Department of Revenue, or law enforcement officer who qualifies for disability allowances pursuant to Code Section 47-2-221 shall not be entitled to any benefits provided in this Code section.

This Code section shall not apply to employees of the Department of Transportation covered by Code Section 32-2-7.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1491, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 738, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2966, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(15); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(15); Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-93/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “employee of the Department of Community Supervision,” in subsection (e).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, the definitions in subsection (a) were alphabetized.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 2966, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Section 1 of this Act shall be repealed in its entirety 30 days after it becomes effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval; provided, however, that any benefit granted prior to the repeal of the Act shall continue to exist beyond the date of such repeal.” The Governor approved this Act on May 4, 1992.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).